src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 front
!!€  ällistynyt: ällistynyt+A+Sg+Nom # amazed
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Old -e^ final stems

LEXICON ADJ_AHNE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 back
!!€  ahne: ahne+A+Sg+Nom # greedy
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:he  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TERVE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 front
!!€  terve: terve+A+Sg+Nom # healthy
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!
LEXICON ADJ_KADE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 d~t back
!!€  kade: kade+A+Sg+Nom # jealous
0:de  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:det  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HELLE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 l~t back
!!€  helle: helle+A+Sg+Nom # warm weather
0:le  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:let  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

!!  Gapping almost all variants of gradations with e, as well as all dual
!!  nominative stems.

!!  !Exceptional adjectives
!!  The ones that do not fit in the official classes shown in dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_PITKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective pitkä
!!€  pitkä: pitkä+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  pidempi: pitkä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pisin: pitkä+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PARAS

0:a  ADJ_BACK_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:aha  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:as  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:haa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:haa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;

0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_OIKEE
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:e  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_AINUT
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:t  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:t  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:u  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;


!!  !Plurales tantum?
!!  Adjectives aren't typically plural words, but there are some in the
!!  dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_LEUATTOMAT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective plurales
!!€  leuattomat: leuattomat+A+Pl+Nom # ?
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:on  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_KOLMAS

:n	ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

LEXICON ADJ_NELJÄS

:n	ADJ_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
ahne+A:ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
ainut+A:ainu  ADJ_AINUT  ;
alikehittynyt+A:ali#kehittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
edesmennyt+A:edesmenn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
edistynyt+A:edistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ehtynyt+A:ehtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
eksynyt+A:eksyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
eloonjäänyt+A:eloonjään  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
elpynyt+A:elpyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
elähtänyt+A:elähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
eristynyt+A:eristyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
eristäytynyt+A:eristäytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
eriytynyt+A:eriytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
erääntynyt+A:erääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
estynyt+A:estyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
heikennyt+A:heikenn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
heikentynyt+A:heikentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
helle+A:hel  ADJ_HELLE  ;
hengästynyt+A:hengästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
herkistynyt+A:herkistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
herännyt+A:heränn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hiertynyt+A:hiertyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hiiltynyt+A:hiiltyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
himmentynyt+A:himmentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
himmentänyt+A:himmentän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hyytynyt+A:hyytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
häikäistynyt+A:häikäistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
häiriintynyt+A:häiriintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
häkeltynyt+A:häkeltyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hämmentynyt+A:hämmentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hämmästynyt+A:hämmästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hämärtynyt+A:hämärtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
härskiintynyt+A:härskiintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hölmistynyt+A:hölmistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
höpsähtänyt+A:höpsähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
höyrystynyt+A:höyrystyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ikävystynyt+A:ikävystyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ikääntynyt+A:ikääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
itkettynyt+A:itkettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
itänyt+A:itän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jähmettynyt+A:jähmettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jälkeenjäänyt+A:jälkeenjään  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jälleensyntynyt+A:jälleensyntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jännittynyt+A:jännittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
järjestäytynyt+A:järjestäytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
järkkynyt+A:järkkyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
järkyttynyt+A:järkyttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jäsentynyt+A:jäsentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jäähtynyt+A:jäähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
jäätynyt+A:jäätyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kade+A:ka  ADJ_KADE  ;
kahdeksas+A:kahdeksa  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
kehittynyt+A:kehittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kertynyt+A:kertyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
keskittynyt+A:keskittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kiertynyt+A:kiertyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kiihtynyt+A:kiihtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kiinteytynyt+A:kiinteytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kiintynyt+A:kiintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kiteytynyt+A:kiteytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kivettynyt+A:kivettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kolmas+A:kolma  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
koulunkäynyt+A:koulunkäyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
koulunkäynyt+A:koulun#käyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kuolemanväsynyt+A:kuolemanväsyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kuolemanväsynyt+A:kuoleman#väsyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kuudes+A:kuude  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
kyllästynyt+A:kyllästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kymmenes+A:kymmene  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
kypsynyt+A:kypsyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
käpertynyt+A:käpertyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kärventynyt+A:kärventyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kääntynyt+A:kääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
köyhtynyt+A:köyhtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
leuattomat+A:leuat  ADJ_LEUATTOMAT  ;
levittäytynyt+A:levittäytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
levännyt+A:levänn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
liittynyt+A:liittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
limittynyt+A:limittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
lisääntynyt+A:lisääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
litistynyt+A:litistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
lyhentynyt+A:lyhentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
läkähtynyt+A:läkähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
menestynyt+A:menestyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
menettänyt+A:menettän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
mennyt+A:menn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
metsittynyt+A:metsittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
mieltynyt+A:mieltyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
mykistynyt+A:mykistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
mädännyt+A:mädänn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
mädäntynyt+A:mädäntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
neljäs+A:neljä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
nyölääntynyt+A:nyölääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
näivettynyt+A:näivettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
nälkiintynyt+A:nälkiintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
närkästynyt+A:närkästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
oikee+A:oike  ADJ_OIKEE  ;
oikee+A:oike  ADJ_OIKEE  ;
paras+A:par  ADJ_PARAS  ;
peittynyt+A:peittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pelästynyt+A:pelästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
perehtynyt+A:perehtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
periytynyt+A:periytyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pettynyt+A:pettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pidentynyt+A:pidentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pidättynyt+A:pidättyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pienentynyt+A:pienentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
piintynyt+A:piintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
piirtynyt+A:piirtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pinttynyt+A:pinttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
piristynyt+A:piristyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pitkä+A:pi  ADJ_PITKÄ  ;
pitkästynyt+A:pitkästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pysähtynyt+A:pysähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
päihtynyt+A:päihtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
päättynyt+A:päättyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pöllämystynyt+A:pöllämystyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
raakile+A:raakile  ADJ_AHNE  ;
rahanahne+A:rahan#ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
rahanahne+A:rahanahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
repale+A:repale  ADJ_AHNE  ;
ryvettynyt+A:ryvettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ränsistynyt+A:ränsistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
rättiväsynyt+A:rätti#väsyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
seitsemäs+A:seitsemä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
selvinnyt+A:selvinn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
sisäänpäinkääntynyt+A:sisäänpäinkääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
sykähtynyt+A:sykähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
syntynyt+A:syntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
syttynyt+A:syttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
syöpynyt+A:syöpyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
säikähtänyt+A:säikähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
terve+A:terve  ADJ_TERVE  ;
tervehtynyt+A:tervehtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
tiine+A:tiine  ADJ_TERVE  ;
tuore+A:tuore  ADJ_AHNE  ;
tylsistynyt+A:tylsistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
typertynyt+A:typertyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
tyydyttynyt+A:tyydyttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
työllistynyt+A:työllistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
tärveltynyt+A:tärveltyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
unissakävellyt+A:unissakävell  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
uudelleensyntynyt+A:uudelleensyntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
valantehnyt+A:valantehn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
vastasyntynyt+A:vastasyntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
vettynyt+A:vettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
viides+A:viide  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
viivästynyt+A:viivästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
virittynyt+A:virittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
virttynyt+A:virttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
väljähtynyt+A:väljähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
vääntynyt+A:vääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ydintynyt+A:ydintyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
yhdeksäs+A:yhdeksä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
yhtynyt+A:yhtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ylevöitynyt+A:ylevöityn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
yliahne+A:yli#ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
yliahne+A:yliahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
yliherkistynyt+A:yli#herkistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ylijännittynyt+A:yli#jännittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ällistynyt+A:ällistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ärtynyt+A:ärtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
